Missouri, session 2026, HB3532.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 21.1070, to read as follows:
21.1070. 1. The general assembly shall create educational materials for use in
educating children about the legislative process in Missouri and how such process is
shaped by the United States Constitution, the Constitution of Missouri, and federal and
state law.
2. Educational materials under subsection 1 of this section may include, but shall
not be limited to, real world experiences, publications, reasonable accommodations for
place-based learning, opportunities for civic engagement, and digital resources.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.